Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 29 Wireless Telephone Regulatory Modernization Act

39-29-1.
Jurisdiction over wireless service.

Notwithstanding any general or public law to the contrary, the commission and the division shall have no jurisdiction or authority over wireless service.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 135, § 3.

39-29-2.
Authority unaffected.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to modify or affect the jurisdiction or authority of the commission or the division over exchange-access rates or the rights or obligations of any carrier pursuant to 47 U.S.C. § 251 or 47 U.S.C. § 252. Nor shall this chapter be construed to modify or affect the authority of the commission to designate eligible telecommunications carriers pursuant to federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 135, § 3.

39-29-3.
Residential local exchange service.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to modify the jurisdiction or authority of the commission or the division over standalone residential local exchange service, meaning residential service that only provides access to E-911 and voice telephone calling wholly within a local service calling area on a measured or unlimited service basis.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 135, § 3.

39-29-4.
Consumer protection.

Nothing in this chapter shall derogate from or be construed as a limitation on the common law or statutory authority of the attorney general to enforce consumer protection or unfair or deceptive trade practice statutes and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 135, § 3.

39-29-5.
Unaffected fees.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect, mandate, or prohibit the assessment of nondiscriminatory enhanced 911 fees, telecommunications education access fund fees, or telecommunications relay service fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 135, § 3.

39-29-6.
No effect on tax obligations.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to modify or affect any tax obligations imposed by §

44-13-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 135, § 3.